District of Columbia statutes.
4-208.03

Underpayment corrections.

(a)

When a recipient of public assistance receives a payment or series of payments in an amount less than that for which the recipient is eligible, or does not receive payments for which the recipient is eligible, the underpayment shall be corrected retroactively for not more than 12 months prior to whichever of the following occurs first:

(1)

The date the Mayor received a request for restoration of assistance from the recipient;

(2)

The date the recipient requested a fair hearing concerning the loss of assistance; or

(3)

The date the Mayor is notified or otherwise discovered that a loss of benefits to an assistance unit has occurred.

(b)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer an entitlement to public assistance to any individual. The decision to grant public assistance to an eligible individual lies in the sole discretion of the Mayor.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 803, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(aaa), 46 DCR 905

History

1981 Ed., § 3-208.3.

Prior Codifications

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(aa) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(aaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(aaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(aaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(aaa) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).

Emergency Legislation